Vermont, session 2025-2026, H602.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Road Rule Repeal * * *
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 6001(3)(A) is amended to read:
(3)(A) “Development” means each of the following:
* * *
(xii) The construction of a road or roads and any associated
driveways to provide access to or within a tract of land owned or controlled by
a person. For the purposes of determining jurisdiction under this subdivision,
any new development or subdivision on a parcel of land that will be provided
VT LEG #385857 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.602
2026 Page 2 of 16
access by the road and associated driveways is land involved in the
construction of the road.
(I) Jurisdiction under this subdivision shall not apply unless the
length of any single road is greater than 800 feet, or the length of all roads and
any associated driveways in combination is greater than 2,000 feet.
(II) As used in this subdivision (xii), “roads” include any new
road or improvement to a class 4 town highway by a person other than a
municipality, including roads that will be transferred to or maintained by a
municipality after their construction or improvement. Routine maintenance and
minor repairs of a Class 4 highway shall not constitute an “improvement.”
Routine maintenance shall include replacing a culvert or ditch, applying new
stone, grading, or making repairs after adverse weather. Routine maintenance
shall not include changing the size of the road, changing the location or layout
of the road, or adding pavement.
(III) For the purpose of determining the length of any road and
associated driveways, the length of all other roads and driveways within the
tract of land constructed after July 1, 2026 shall be included.
(IV) This subdivision (xii) shall not apply to:
(aa) a State or municipal road, a utility corridor of an electric
transmission or distribution company, or a road used primarily for farming or
forestry purposes;
VT LEG #385857 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.602
2026 Page 3 of 16
(bb) development within a Tier 1A area established in
accordance with section 6034 of this title or a Tier 1B area established in
accordance with section 6033 of this title; and
(cc) improvements underway when this section takes effect
to a Class 4 highway that will be transferred to the municipality.
(V) The conversion of a road used for farming or forestry
purposes that also meets the requirements of this subdivision (xii) shall
constitute development.
(VI) The intent of this subdivision (xii) is to encourage the
design of clustered subdivisions and development that does not fragment Tier 2
areas or Tier 3 areas. [Repealed.]
* * *
* * * Interim Exemption Extension * * *
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 6001 (3)(D) is amended to read:
(D) The word “development” does not include:
* * *
(viii)(I) The construction of a priority housing project in a
municipality with a population of 10,000 or more.
* * *
(III) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, until January July 1, 2027 2030, the construction of a priority
VT LEG #385857 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.602
2026 Page 4 of 16
housing project or related subdivision located entirely within areas of a
designated downtown development district, designated neighborhood
development area, or a designated growth center or within one-half mile
around such designated center with permanent zoning and subdivision bylaws
served by public sewer or water services or soils that are adequate for
wastewater disposal. For purposes of this subdivision (III), in order for a
parcel to qualify for the exemption, at least 51 percent of the parcel shall be
located within one-half mile of the designated center boundary. If the one-half
mile around the designated center extends into an adjacent municipality, the
legislative body of the adjacent municipal may inform the Board that it does
not want the exemption to extend into that area.
Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A. § 6081 is amended to read:
§ 6081. PERMITS REQUIRED; EXEMPTIONS
* * *
(bb) Until July 1, 2028 2030, no permit or permit amendment is required
for the construction of improvements for one accessory dwelling unit
constructed within or appurtenant to a single-family dwelling. Units
constructed pursuant to this subsection shall not count towards the total units
constructed in other projects.
VT LEG #385857 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.602
2026 Page 5 of 16
(cc) Until July 1, 2028 2030, no permit amendment is required for the
construction of improvements for converting a structure used for a commercial
purpose to 29 or fewer housing units.
(dd) Interim housing exemptions.
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, until
January July 1, 2027 2030, no permit or permit amendment is required for the
subdivision for or the construction of housing projects and mixed-use
development such as cooperatives, condominiums, dwellings, or mobile
homes, with 75 units or fewer, constructed or maintained on a tract or tracts of
land, located entirely within the areas of a designated new town center, a
designated growth center, or a designated neighborhood development area
served by public sewer or water services or soils that are adequate for
wastewater disposal. Housing units constructed pursuant to this subdivision
shall not count towards the total units constructed in other areas. This
exemption shall not apply to areas within mapped river corridors and
floodplains except those areas containing preexisting development in areas
suitable for infill development as defined in 29-201 of the Vermont Flood
Hazard Area and River Corridor Rule.
(2)(A) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, until
July 1, 2027 2030, no permit or permit amendment is required for the
subdivision for or the construction of housing projects and mixed-use
VT LEG #385857 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.602
2026 Page 6 of 16
development such as cooperatives, condominiums, dwellings, or mobile
homes, with 50 or fewer units, constructed or maintained on a tract or tracts of
land of 10 acres or less, located entirely within:
(i) areas of a designated village center and within one-quarter mile
of its boundary with permanent zoning and subdivision bylaws and served by
public sewer or water services or soils that are adequate for wastewater
disposal; or
(ii) areas of a municipality that are within a census-designated
urbanized area with over 50,000 residents and or within one-quarter mile of a
transit route.
* * *
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, until
January July 1, 2027 2030, no permit or permit amendment is required for the
subdivision for or the construction of housing projects and mixed-use
development such as cooperatives, condominiums, dwellings, or mobile
homes, constructed or maintained on a tract or tracts of land, located entirely
within a designated downtown development district with permanent zoning
and subdivision bylaws served by public sewer or water services or soils that
are adequate for wastewater disposal. Housing units constructed pursuant to
this subdivision shall not count towards the total units constructed in other
areas. This exemption shall not apply to areas within mapped river corridors
VT LEG #385857 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.602
2026 Page 7 of 16
and floodplains except those areas containing preexisting development in areas
suitable for infill development as defined in 29-201 of the Vermont Flood
Hazard Area and River Corridor Rule.
* * * Tier 1B and 1A * * *
Sec. 4. 10 V.S.A. § 6033 is amended to read:
§ 6033. REGIONAL PLAN FUTURE LAND USE MAP REVIEW
* * *
(c) To obtain a Tier 1B area status under this section, the regional planning
commission shall demonstrate to the Board that the municipalities with Tier 1B
areas meet the following requirements as included in subdivision 24 V.S.A.
§ 4348a(a)(12)(C):
(1) The municipality has not requested to have opt out of having the area
mapped for Tier 1B. A municipality may request to opt out of Tier 1B area
status by submitting a resolution passed by the municipality to the relevant
regional planning commission and the Board.
* * *
Sec. 5. 10 V.S.A. § 6034 is amended to read:
§ 6034. TIER 1A AREA STATUS
* * *
VT LEG #385857 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.602
2026 Page 8 of 16
(b) Tier 1A area status requirements.
(1) To obtain a Tier 1A area status under this section, a municipality
shall demonstrate to the Board that it has each of the following:
* * *
(I) Municipal staff, regional planning commission staff, or other
contracted capacity adequate to support coordinated comprehensive and capital
planning, development review, and zoning administration in the Tier 1A area.
* * *
Sec. 6. 10 V.S.A. § 6081(z) is amended to read:
(z)(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary,
no permit or permit amendment is required for any subdivision, development,
or change to an existing project that is located entirely within a Tier 1A area
under section 6034 of this chapter.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary,
no permit or permit amendment is required within a Tier 1B area approved by
the Board under section 6033 of this chapter for 50 units or fewer of housing
on a tract or tracts of land involving 10 acres or less or for mixed-use
development with 50 units or fewer of housing on a tract or tracts of land
involving 10 acres or less.
(3) Upon receiving notice and a copy of the permit issued by an
appropriate municipal panel pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 4460(g), a previously
VT LEG #385857 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.602
2026 Page 9 of 16
issued permit for a development or subdivision located in a Tier 1A area shall
remain attached to the property. However, neither the Board nor the Agency
of Natural Resources shall enforce the permit or assert amendment jurisdiction
on the tract or tracts of land unless the designation is revoked or the
municipality has not taken any reasonable action to enforce the conditions of
the permit.
Sec. 7. REPEAL
24 V.S.A. § 4460(g) is repealed.
* * * By-Right Housing * * *
Sec. 8. 24 V.S.A. § 4412(1)(D) is amended to read:
(D) Bylaws shall designate appropriate districts and reasonable
regulations for multiunit or multifamily dwellings. No bylaw shall have the
effect of excluding these multiunit or multifamily dwellings from the
municipality. In any district that allows year-round residential development,
duplexes shall be an allowed a permitted use with dimensional standards that
are not more restrictive than is required for a single-unit dwelling, including no
additional land or lot area than would be required for a single-unit dwelling. In
any district that is served by municipal sewer and water infrastructure that
allows residential development, multiunit dwellings with four or fewer units
shall be a permitted use on the same size lot as single-unit dwelling, unless that
district specifically requires multiunit structures to have more than four
VT LEG #385857 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.602
2026 Page 10 of 16
dwelling units. In any district that allows residential development, single
family or multi-unit dwellings that conform with the designs approved by the
Department of Housing and Community Development pursuant to section
4412a of this chapter shall be a permitted use and shall only be regulated as
described in subdivision 4413(a)(1)(I) of this chapter.
Sec. 9. 24 V.S.A. § 4413 is amended to read:
§ 4413. LIMITATIONS ON MUNICIPAL BYLAWS
(a)(1) The following uses may be regulated only with respect to location,
size, height, building bulk, yards, courts, setbacks, density of buildings, off-
street parking, loading facilities, traffic, noise, lighting, landscaping, and
screening requirements, and only to the extent that regulations do not have the
effect of interfering with the intended functional use:
(A) State- or community-owned and -operated institutions and
facilities;
(B) public and private schools and other educational institutions
certified by the Agency of Education;
(C) churches and other places of worship, convents, and parish
houses;
(D) public and private hospitals;
(E) regional solid waste management facilities certified under 10
V.S.A. chapter 159;
VT LEG #385857 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.602
2026 Page 11 of 16
(F) hazardous waste management facilities for which a notice of
intent to construct has been received under 10 V.S.A. § 6606a;
(G) emergency shelters; and
(H) hotels and motels converted to permanently affordable housing
developments; and
(I) by-right residential buildings developed pursuant to section 4412a
of this chapter.
* * *
Sec. 10. 24 V.S.A. § 4412a is added to read:
§ 4412a. BY-RIGHT HOUSING DESIGNS
(a)(1) The Commissioner of Housing and Community Development shall
adopt a portfolio of designed and engineered single family, multi-unit
residential, and mixed-used buildings that will be available to the public to use
to develop residential housing and mixed-used developments.
(2) Prior to the adoption of any design or portfolio of designs, the
Commissioner shall provide a public comment period and hold at least one
public hearing.
(3) The Commissioner shall post the designs on the Department’s
website for public use, subject to any necessary disclaimers.
(b) A municipality shall accept the designs adopted under this section as
permitted, subject to the limitations in section 4413 of this chapter.
VT LEG #385857 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.602
2026 Page 12 of 16
(c) A municipality may not undertake a review of the housing of mixed-use
development by a discretionary panel if a zoning application meets the
minimum requirements set forth in the municipality’s bylaws.
* * * Housing Targets * * *
Sec. 11. 24 V.S.A. § 4388 is added to read:
§ 4388. PLANNING FOR HOUSING TARGETS
(a) A municipal plan shall include an analysis of regulatory and physical
constraints preventing the municipality from developing sufficient housing to
meet the regional housing targets developed pursuant to subdivision
4348a(a)(9) of this title as follows:
(1) The municipality shall identify and analyze existing and projected
housing needs for the projected population of the jurisdiction and provide
regulations that allow for the rehabilitation, improvement, or development of
the number of housing units needed, as identified in the land use plan and
future land use map, including:
(A) a quantification of the jurisdiction’s existing and projected
needed housing types, including location, age, condition, and occupancy
required to accommodate existing and estimated population projections;
(B) an inventory of sites, including zoned, unzoned, vacant,
underutilized, and potential redevelopment sites, available to meet the
jurisdiction’s needed housing types;
VT LEG #385857 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.602
2026 Page 13 of 16
(C) an analysis of any constraints to housing development, such as
zoning, development standards, and infrastructure needs and capacity, and the
identification of market-based incentives that may affect or encourage the
development of needed housing types; and
(D) a detailed description of what actions the jurisdiction may take to
accommodate the projected needed housing types identified in subdivision (A)
of this subdivision (1), including:
(i) updates to specific zoning or municipal bylaw provisions or
maps; and
(ii) updates to specific infrastructure, including municipal water
and sewer capacity.
(2) The housing section of the land use plan and future land use map
may incorporate by reference any information or policies identified in other
housing needs assessments adopted by the governing body.
(3) If, after performing the analysis required in subdivision (1) of this
subsection, the legislative body of the municipality determines that the total
needed housing types may not be met due to lack of resources, development
sites, infrastructure capacity, or other documented constraints, the legislative
body shall establish the minimum number of housing units that may be
rehabilitated, improved, or developed within the jurisdiction over the 20-year
VT LEG #385857 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.602
2026 Page 14 of 16
planning period and the actions the legislative body may take to remove
constraints to the development of those units over that period.
(4) Progress toward the construction of the housing units identified as
needed to meet projected housing needs during the 20-year planning period of
the land use plan must be documented at each municipal plan adoption,
renewal, or readoption pursuant to section 4358 or 4357 of this title.
(5) The amount of detail provided in the analysis beyond the minimum
criteria established in this section is at the discretion of the legislative body.
* * * Tax Credits * * *
Sec. 12. 32 V.S.A. § 5930ee is amended to read:
§ 5930ee. LIMITATIONS
Beginning in fiscal year 2010 and thereafter, the State Board may award tax
credits to all qualified applicants under this subchapter, provided that:
(1) the total amount of tax credits awarded annually, together with sales
tax reallocated under section 9819 of this title, does not exceed $3,000,000.00
$5,000,000.00.
* * *
Sec. 13. TAX CREDITS
$250,000.00 in five-year tax credits is authorized for an additional 26 years
to continue the Down Payment Assistance Program.
VT LEG #385857 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.602
2026 Page 15 of 16
* * * Funding * * *
Sec. 14. OFF-SITE CONSTRUCTION ACCELERATOR
(a) In fiscal year 2027, $6,000,000.00 is appropriated to the Agency of
Commerce and Community Development to develop a pilot demonstration
project and study that explores the possibilities of reducing housing
development costs through modular construction.
(b) The pilot will consider the following elements:
(1) bulk purchasing;
(2) streamlining regulatory processes by creating preapproved modular
designs;
(3) creating a loan loss reserve for construction loans;
(4) modular construction;
(5) off-site construction;
(6) statewide procurement consortium for bulk orders of modular units
and materials;
(7) pooled demand;
(8) aligned State and local permitting; and
(9) creation and adoption of off-site building codes.
(c) The pilot shall occur in a municipality willing to participate in
regulatory reforms necessary to implement the process and accept the
constructed homes.
VT LEG #385857 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.602
2026 Page 16 of 16
(d) A municipal planning grant will be available to the participating
municipality to assist in enacting the necessary regulatory reforms.
Sec. 15. POSITIONS
(a) The establishment of two new positions is authorized at the Department
of Housing and Community Development. The Department shall be annually
appropriated:
(1) $300,000.00 for two full-time employees; and
(2) $6,000,000.00 in base program funding.
(b) In fiscal year 2027, $150,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund
to the Department of Housing and Community Development for one full-time
exempt employee to increase capacity to administer programs including
municipal planning grants, Homes for All developer trainings, 802 Homes
Initiative, and Housing Data analysis and reporting.
Sec. 16. APPROPRIATION
In fiscal year 2027, $250,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Municipal and Regional Planning and Resilience Fund to increase available
municipal planning grants for municipalities seeking to meet the housing
targets established pursuant to 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181.
Sec. 17. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385857 v.2